District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1301.30

Correction of Mayor’s action within 1 year.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 129, ch. 222, § 30
Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 862, Pub. L. 86-730, § 4
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155, § 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1981 Ed., § 40-430.
1973 Ed., § 40-446.